Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.150

Renewal of license or associate license, rules—Failure to renew.

The secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for renewal of a license or associate license. Failure to renew shall invalidate the license or associate license and all privileges granted by the license. If an associate license has lapsed, the person shall submit an updated declaration, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, that the person is working toward full licensure. If a license has lapsed for a period longer than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of the secretary by taking continuing education courses, or meeting other standards determined by the secretary. If an associate license has lapsed, the person shall submit an updated declaration, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, that the person is working toward full licensure.

[ 2008 c 135 s 14; 2001 c 251 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 135 ss 1, 2, 7-9, and 11-19: See note following RCW 18.19.020.